Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.110

Legislative declaration—Payments to state employees on account of sickness.

It is the policy of the state of Washington to pay its employees on account of sickness or accident disability in accordance with applicable leave regulations and in such a manner so such payments are excluded from federal old age and survivors' insurance contribution requirements.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 247 s 3.]